District of Columbia statutes.
1-308.08

Default.

If there shall be a default in the payment of the principal of, or interest on, any Bonds of a series after the principal or interest shall become due and payable, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, or if the District shall fail or refuse to carry out and perform the terms of any agreement with the holders of any of the Bonds, the holders of the Bonds, or the trustee appointed to act on behalf of the holders of the Bonds, may, subject to the provisions of the financing documents, do the following:

(1)

By action, writ, or other proceeding, enforce all rights of the holders of the Bonds, including the right to require the District to carry out and perform the terms of any agreement with the holders of the Bonds or its duties under this part;

(2)

By action, require the District to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust;

(3)

By action, petition to enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of the Bonds; and

(4)

Declare all the Bonds due and payable, whether or not in advance of maturity and, if all the defaults be made good, annul the declaration and its consequences.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-293, § 9, 52 DCR 1465